Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.070

Office at county seat.

The prosecuting attorney of each county in the state of Washington must keep an office at the county seat of the county of which he or she is prosecuting attorney.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4049; 1963 c 4 s 36.27.070. Prior: 1909 c 122 s 1; RRS s 4139.]